apertium-bho.bho.dix
    <pardef n="स/ा__adj">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="गलत__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ऐ__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="खुशब/ू__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुएँ</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ऐ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

    <pardef n="बोल__vblex_tv">  
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ब</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेब</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ब</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेब</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ब</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ब</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ब</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ब</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ीहन</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीहन</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीहन</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीहन</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
      <e><p><l>े के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ल</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ले</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ले</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>त</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>त</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>त</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>त</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>लन</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>लन</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>लन</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>लन</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="रहल__vaux">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  

    <pardef n="आप__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="frm"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="frm"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="चल__vblex_iv"> <!--change-->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>तानी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>तानी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="गईल__vblex"> <!--change-->
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="लउकल__vblex"> <!--change-->
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="देखल"><i>देखल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="गईल"><i>गईल</i><par n="गईल__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लउकल"><i>लउकल</i><par n="लउकल__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="कहल"><i>कहल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="निकेल"><i>निकेल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="बड़ा"><i>बड़ा</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खेल"><i>खेल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="सकल"><i>सकल</i><par n="रहल__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="फुलवारी"><i>फुलवारी</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खेलल"><i>खेलल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="हई"><i>हई</i><par n="गईल__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खुस"><i>खुस</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुरनका"><i>पुरनका</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गिनती"><i>गिनती</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="समापन"><i>समापन</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खोज"><i>खोज</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="हँसुआ"><i>हँसुआ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="हर"><i>हर</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="देखे"><i>देखे</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="जान"><i>जान</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="मालूम"><i>मालूम</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="बोल"><i>बोल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="अधवा"><i>अधवा</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आड़ा"><i>आड़ा</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अंझुराईल"><i>अंझुराईल</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अंडनियर"><i>अंडनियर</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अऊअल"><i>अऊअल</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अकिला"><i>अकिला</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अगिआह"><i>अगिआह</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अगूढ़"><i>अगूढ़</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अछम्य"><i>अछम्य</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अछम"><i>अछम</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अजय"><i>अजय</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अजीज"><i>अजीज</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अजोग"><i>अजोग</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अत"><i>अत</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आप"><i>आप</i><par n="आप__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="समर"><i>समर</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="य"><i>य</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ई"><i>ई</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="संग्राम"><i>संग्राम</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="टाइम"><i>टाइम</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मदद"><i>मदद</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मई"><i>मई</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="श्री"><i>श्री</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="नेतागिरी"><i>नेतागिरी</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="त"><i>त</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खून"><i>खून</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मुअवालसज़ा"><i>मुअवालसज़ा</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खातिर"><i>खातिर</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="शिक्षा"><i>शिक्षा</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जीत"><i>जीत</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ठीकसे"><i>ठीकसे</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="समझ"><i>समझ</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="वे"><i>वे</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कथन"><i>कथन</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आक्रमण"><i>आक्रमण</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चर्बी"><i>चर्बी</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="असहायता"><i>असहायता</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सफलता"><i>सफलता</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वीकारकरलेले"><i>स्वीकारकरलेले</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गुण"><i>गुण</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पुस्तिका"><i>पुस्तिका</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="राष्ट्रीयता"><i>राष्ट्रीयता</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जनता"><i>जनता</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="याद"><i>याद</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सत्ता"><i>सत्ता</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तरीका"><i>तरीका</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="छूटल"><i>छूटल</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ज्ञान"><i>ज्ञान</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="धूरा"><i>धूरा</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दयालुता"><i>दयालुता</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="वीं"><i>वीं</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गुरू"><i>गुर</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कूटनीति"><i>कूटनीति</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आज़ादी"><i>आज़ादी</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="महक"><i>महक</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
